Missouri, session 2026, SB858.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 1.410, 1.420, 1.430, 1.440, 1.450,
1.460, 1.470, 1.480, and 1.485, RSMo, are repealed and six new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 1.411,
1.451, 1.461, 1.471, 1.481, and 1.484, to read as follows:
1.411. 1. Sections 1.411 to 1.484 shall be known and
may be cited as the "Second Amendment Preservation Act".
2. The general assembly finds and declares that:
(1) The general assembly of the state of Missouri is
firmly resolved to support and defend the Constitution of
the United States against every aggression, whether foreign
or domestic, and is duty-bound to oppose every infraction of
those principles that constitute the basis of the union of
the states because only a faithful observance of those
principles can secure the union's existence and the public
happiness;
(2) Acting through the Constitution of the United
States, the people of the several states created the federal
government to be their agent in the exercise of a few
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 858 2
defined powers, while reserving for the state governments
the power to legislate on matters concerning the lives,
liberties, and properties of citizens in the ordinary course
of affairs;
(3) The limitation of the federal government's power
is affirmed under Amendment X of the Constitution of the
United States, which defines the total scope of federal
powers as being those that have been delegated by the people
of the several states to the federal government and all
powers not delegated to the federal government in the
Constitution of the United States are reserved to the states
respectively or the people themselves;
(4) If the federal government assumes powers that the
people did not grant it in the Constitution of the United
States, its acts are unauthoritative, void, and of no force;
(5) The several states of the United States respect
the proper role of the federal government but reject the
proposition that such respect requires unlimited
submission. If the federal government, created by a compact
among the states, were the exclusive or final judge of the
extent of the powers granted to it by the states through the
Constitution of the United States, the federal government's
discretion, and not the Constitution of the United States,
would necessarily become the measure of those powers. To
the contrary, as in all other cases of compacts among powers
having no common judge, each party has an equal right to
judge for itself as to whether infractions of the compact
have occurred, as well as to determine the mode and measure
of redress. Although the several states have granted
supremacy to laws and treaties made under the powers granted
in the Constitution of the United States, such supremacy
does not extend to various federal statutes, executive

SB 858 3
orders, administrative orders, court orders, rules,
regulations, or other actions that collect data or restrict
or prohibit the manufacture, ownership, or use of firearms,
firearm accessories, or ammunition exclusively within the
borders of Missouri; such statutes, executive orders,
administrative orders, court orders, rules, regulations, and
other actions exceed the powers granted to the federal
government except to the extent they are necessary and
proper for governing and regulating the United States Armed
Forces or for organizing, arming, and disciplining militia
forces actively employed in the service of the United States
Armed Forces;
(6) The people of the several states have given
Congress the power "to regulate commerce with foreign
nations, and among the several states", but "regulating
commerce" does not include the power to limit citizens'
right to keep and bear arms in defense of their families,
neighbors, persons, or property nor to dictate what sorts of
arms and accessories law-abiding Missourians may buy, sell,
exchange, or otherwise possess within the borders of this
state;
(7) The people of the several states have also granted
Congress the powers "to lay and collect taxes, duties,
imports, and excises, to pay the debts, and provide for the
common defense and general welfare of the United States" and
"to make all laws which shall be necessary and proper for
carrying into execution the powers vested by the
Constitution of the United States in the government of the
United States, or in any department or office thereof".
These constitutional provisions merely identify the means by
which the federal government may execute its limited powers
and shall not be construed to grant unlimited power because

SB 858 4
to do so would be to destroy the carefully constructed
equilibrium between the federal and state governments.
Consequently, the general assembly rejects any claim that
the taxing and spending powers of Congress may be used to
diminish in any way the right of the people to keep and bear
arms;
(8) The general assembly finds that the federal excise
tax rate on arms and ammunition in effect prior to January
1, 2026, which funds programs under the Wildlife Restoration
Act, does not have a chilling effect on the purchase or
ownership of such arms and ammunition;
(9) The people of Missouri have vested the general
assembly with the authority to regulate the manufacture,
possession, exchange, and use of firearms within the borders
of this state, subject only to the limits imposed by
Amendment II of the Constitution of the United States and
the Constitution of Missouri; and
(10) The general assembly of the state of Missouri
strongly promotes responsible gun ownership, including
parental supervision of minors in the proper use, storage,
and ownership of all firearms; the prompt reporting of
100 stolen firearms; and the proper enforcement of all state gun
101 laws. The general assembly of the state of Missouri hereby
102 condemns any unlawful transfer of firearms and the use of
103 any firearm in any criminal or unlawful activity.
1.451. No public officer or employee of this state or
any political subdivision of this state shall have the
authority to enforce or attempt to enforce any federal acts,
laws, executive orders, administrative orders, rules,
regulations, statutes, or ordinances regarding firearms,
firearm accessories, or ammunition against law abiding
citizens. Nothing in sections 1.451 to 1.484 shall be

SB 858 5
construed to prohibit Missouri officials from accepting aid
from federal officials in an effort to enforce Missouri laws.
1.461. 1. Any political subdivision or law
enforcement agency that employs a law enforcement officer
who acts knowingly, as defined under section 562.016, to
violate the provisions of section 1.451 or otherwise
knowingly deprives a citizen of Missouri of the rights or
privileges ensured by Amendment II of the Constitution of
the United States or Article I, Section 23 of the
Constitution of Missouri while acting under the color of any
state or federal law shall be liable to the injured party in
an action at law, suit in equity, or other proper proceeding
for redress, and subject to a civil penalty of fifty
thousand dollars per occurrence. Any person injured under
this section shall have standing to pursue an action for
injunctive relief in the circuit court of the county in
which the action allegedly occurred or in the circuit court
of Cole County with respect to the actions of such
individual. The court shall hold a hearing on the motion
for a temporary restraining order and preliminary injunction
within thirty days of service of the petition.
2. In such actions, the court may award the prevailing
party, other than the state of Missouri or any political
subdivision of the state, reasonable attorney's fees and
costs.
3. Sovereign immunity shall not be an affirmative
defense in any action pursuant to this section.
1.471. 1. Any political subdivision or law
enforcement agency that knowingly employs an individual
acting or who previously acted as an official, agent,
employee, or deputy of the government of the United States,
or otherwise acted under the color of federal law within the

SB 858 6
borders of this state, who has knowingly, as defined under
section 562.016, after the adoption of this section:
(1) Enforced, attempted to enforce, or participated in
any way in the enforcement or implementation of any federal
acts, laws, executive orders, rules, regulations, statutes,
or ordinances regarding firearms, firearm accessories, or
ammunition; or
(2) Given material aid and support to the efforts of
another who enforces or attempts to enforce or participates
in any way in the enforcement or implementation of any
federal acts, laws, executive orders, rules, regulations,
statutes, or ordinances regarding firearms, firearm
accessories, or ammunition;
shall be subject to a civil penalty of fifty thousand
dollars per employee hired by the political subdivision or
law enforcement agency involved in a course of conduct
described in subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection.
Each such course of conduct shall subject the political
subdivision or law enforcement agency to a separate civil
penalty. Any person residing in a jurisdiction who believes
that an individual has taken action that would violate the
provisions of this section shall have standing to pursue an
action, but multiple actions relating to the same course of
conduct shall not subject the political subdivision or law
enforcement agency to penalties that total more than fifty
thousand dollars for each employee involved in the course of
conduct.
2. Any person residing or conducting business in a
jurisdiction who believes that an individual has taken
action that would violate the provisions of this section
shall have standing to pursue an action for injunctive

SB 858 7
relief in the circuit court of the county in which the
action allegedly occurred or in the circuit court of Cole
County with respect to the actions of such individual. The
court shall hold a hearing on the motion for a temporary
restraining order and preliminary injunction within thirty
days of service of the petition.
3. In such actions, the court may award the prevailing
party, other than the state of Missouri or any political
subdivision of the state, reasonable attorney's fees and
costs.
4. Sovereign immunity shall not be an affirmative
defense in any action pursuant to this section.
5. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
prohibit the hiring, or impose any penalties for the hiring,
of any individual whose federal service was as a member of
the armed services of the United States.
1.481. 1. For sections 1.451 to 1.484, the term "law-
abiding citizen" shall mean a person who is not otherwise
precluded under state law from possessing a firearm and
shall not be construed to include anyone who is not legally
present in the United States or the state of Missouri.
2. For the purposes of sections 1.451 to 1.484,
"material aid and support" shall include voluntarily giving
or allowing others to make use of lodging; communications
equipment or services, including social media accounts;
facilities; weapons; personnel; transportation; clothing; or
other physical assets. Material aid and support shall not
include giving or allowing the use of medicine or other
materials necessary to treat physical injuries, nor shall
the term include any assistance provided to help persons
escape a serious, present risk of life-threatening injury.

SB 858 8
3. It shall not be considered a violation of sections
1.451 to 1.484 to provide material aid to federal officials
who are in pursuit of a suspect when there is a demonstrable
criminal nexus with another state or country and such
suspect is either not a citizen of this state or is not
present in this state.
4. It shall not be considered a violation of sections
1.451 to 1.484 to provide material aid to federal
prosecution for:
(1) Felony crimes against a person when such
prosecution includes weapons violations substantially
similar to those found in chapter 570 or 571 so long as such
weapons violations are merely ancillary to such prosecution;
or
(2) Class A or class B felony violations substantially
similar to those found in chapter 579 when such prosecution
includes weapons violations substantially similar to those
found in chapter 570 or 571 so long as such weapons
violations are merely ancillary to such prosecution.
5. The provisions of sections 1.451 to 1.484 shall be
applicable to offenses occurring on or after August 28, 2026.
1.484. If any provision of sections 1.411 to 1.484 or
the application thereof to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, such determination shall not affect the
provisions or applications of sections 1.411 to 1.484 that
may be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and the provisions of sections 1.411 to 1.484
are severable.
[1.410. 1. Sections 1.410 to 1.485 shall
be known and may be cited as the "Second
Amendment Preservation Act".
2. The general assembly finds and declares
that:

SB 858 9
(1) The general assembly of the state of
Missouri is firmly resolved to support and
defend the Constitution of the United States
against every aggression, whether foreign or
domestic, and is duty-bound to oppose every
infraction of those principles that constitute
the basis of the union of the states because
only a faithful observance of those principles
can secure the union's existence and the public
happiness;
(2) Acting through the Constitution of the
United States, the people of the several states
created the federal government to be their agent
in the exercise of a few defined powers, while
reserving for the state governments the power to
legislate on matters concerning the lives,
liberties, and properties of citizens in the
ordinary course of affairs;
(3) The limitation of the federal
government's power is affirmed under Amendment X
of the Constitution of the United States, which
defines the total scope of federal powers as
being those that have been delegated by the
people of the several states to the federal
government and all powers not delegated to the
federal government in the Constitution of the
United States are reserved to the states
respectively or the people themselves;
(4) If the federal government assumes
powers that the people did not grant it in the
Constitution of the United States, its acts are
unauthoritative, void, and of no force;
(5) The several states of the United
States respect the proper role of the federal
government but reject the proposition that such
respect requires unlimited submission. If the
federal government, created by a compact among
the states, were the exclusive or final judge of
the extent of the powers granted to it by the
states through the Constitution of the United
States, the federal government's discretion, and
not the Constitution of the United States, would
necessarily become the measure of those powers.
To the contrary, as in all other cases of

SB 858 10
compacts among powers having no common judge,
each party has an equal right to judge for
itself as to whether infractions of the compact
have occurred, as well as to determine the mode
and measure of redress. Although the several
states have granted supremacy to laws and
treaties made under the powers granted in the
Constitution of the United States, such
supremacy does not extend to various federal
statutes, executive orders, administrative
orders, court orders, rules, regulations, or
other actions that collect data or restrict or
prohibit the manufacture, ownership, or use of
firearms, firearm accessories, or ammunition
exclusively within the borders of Missouri; such
statutes, executive orders, administrative
orders, court orders, rules, regulations, and
other actions exceed the powers granted to the
federal government except to the extent they are
necessary and proper for governing and
regulating the United States Armed Forces or for
organizing, arming, and disciplining militia
forces actively employed in the service of the
United States Armed Forces;
(6) The people of the several states have
given Congress the power "to regulate commerce
with foreign nations, and among the several
states", but "regulating commerce" does not
include the power to limit citizens' right to
keep and bear arms in defense of their families,
neighbors, persons, or property nor to dictate
what sorts of arms and accessories law-abiding
Missourians may buy, sell, exchange, or
otherwise possess within the borders of this
state;
(7) The people of the several states have
also granted Congress the powers "to lay and
collect taxes, duties, imports, and excises, to
pay the debts, and provide for the common
defense and general welfare of the United
States" and "to make all laws which shall be
necessary and proper for carrying into execution
the powers vested by the Constitution of the
United States in the government of the United

SB 858 11
States, or in any department or office
thereof". These constitutional provisions
merely identify the means by which the federal
government may execute its limited powers and
shall not be construed to grant unlimited power
because to do so would be to destroy the
100 carefully constructed equilibrium between the
101 federal and state governments. Consequently,
102 the general assembly rejects any claim that the
103 taxing and spending powers of Congress may be
104 used to diminish in any way the right of the
105 people to keep and bear arms;
106 (8) The general assembly finds that the
107 federal excise tax rate on arms and ammunition
108 in effect prior to January 1, 2021, which funds
109 programs under the Wildlife Restoration Act,
110 does not have a chilling effect on the purchase
111 or ownership of such arms and ammunition;
112 (9) The people of Missouri have vested the
113 general assembly with the authority to regulate
114 the manufacture, possession, exchange, and use
115 of firearms within the borders of this state,
116 subject only to the limits imposed by Amendment
117 II of the Constitution of the United States and
118 the Constitution of Missouri; and
119 (10) The general assembly of the state of
120 Missouri strongly promotes responsible gun
121 ownership, including parental supervision of
122 minors in the proper use, storage, and ownership
123 of all firearms; the prompt reporting of stolen
124 firearms; and the proper enforcement of all
125 state gun laws. The general assembly of the
126 state of Missouri hereby condemns any unlawful
127 transfer of firearms and the use of any firearm
128 in any criminal or unlawful activity.]
[1.420. The following federal acts, laws,
executive orders, administrative orders, rules,
and regulations shall be considered
infringements on the people's right to keep and
bear arms, as guaranteed by Amendment II of the
Constitution of the United States and Article I,
Section 23 of the Constitution of Missouri,

SB 858 12
within the borders of this state including, but
not limited to:
(1) Any tax, levy, fee, or stamp imposed
on firearms, firearm accessories, or ammunition
not common to all other goods and services and
that might reasonably be expected to create a
chilling effect on the purchase or ownership of
those items by law-abiding citizens;
(2) Any registration or tracking of
firearms, firearm accessories, or ammunition;
(3) Any registration or tracking of the
ownership of firearms, firearm accessories, or
ammunition;
(4) Any act forbidding the possession,
ownership, use, or transfer of a firearm,
firearm accessory, or ammunition by law-abiding
citizens; and
(5) Any act ordering the confiscation of
firearms, firearm accessories, or ammunition
from law-abiding citizens.]
[1.430. All federal acts, laws, executive
orders, administrative orders, rules, and
regulations, regardless of whether they were
enacted before or after the provisions of
sections 1.410 to 1.485, that infringe on the
people's right to keep and bear arms as
guaranteed by the Second Amendment to the
Constitution of the United States and Article I,
Section 23 of the Constitution of Missouri shall
be invalid to this state, shall not be
recognized by this state, shall be specifically
rejected by this state, and shall not be
enforced by this state.]
[1.440. It shall be the duty of the courts
and law enforcement agencies of this state to
protect the rights of law-abiding citizens to
keep and bear arms within the borders of this
state and to protect these rights from the
infringements defined under section 1.420.]
[1.450. No entity or person, including any
public officer or employee of this state or any
political subdivision of this state, shall have

SB 858 13
the authority to enforce or attempt to enforce
any federal acts, laws, executive orders,
administrative orders, rules, regulations,
statutes, or ordinances infringing on the right
to keep and bear arms as described under section
1.420. Nothing in sections 1.410 to 1.480 shall
be construed to prohibit Missouri officials from
accepting aid from federal officials in an
effort to enforce Missouri laws.]
[1.460. 1. Any political subdivision or
law enforcement agency that employs a law
enforcement officer who acts knowingly, as
defined under section 562.016, to violate the
provisions of section 1.450 or otherwise
knowingly deprives a citizen of Missouri of the
rights or privileges ensured by Amendment II of
the Constitution of the United States or Article
I, Section 23 of the Constitution of Missouri
while acting under the color of any state or
federal law shall be liable to the injured party
in an action at law, suit in equity, or other
proper proceeding for redress, and subject to a
civil penalty of fifty thousand dollars per
occurrence. Any person injured under this
section shall have standing to pursue an action
for injunctive relief in the circuit court of
the county in which the action allegedly
occurred or in the circuit court of Cole County
with respect to the actions of such individual.
The court shall hold a hearing on the motion for
temporary restraining order and preliminary
injunction within thirty days of service of the
petition.
2. In such actions, the court may award
the prevailing party, other than the state of
Missouri or any political subdivision of the
state, reasonable attorney's fees and costs.
3. Sovereign immunity shall not be an
affirmative defense in any action pursuant to
this section.]
[1.470. 1. Any political subdivision or
law enforcement agency that knowingly employs an
individual acting or who previously acted as an

SB 858 14
official, agent, employee, or deputy of the
government of the United States, or otherwise
acted under the color of federal law within the
borders of this state, who has knowingly, as
defined under section 562.016, after the
adoption of this section:
(1) Enforced or attempted to enforce any
of the infringements identified in section
1.420; or
(2) Given material aid and support to the
efforts of another who enforces or attempts to
enforce any of the infringements identified in
section 1.420;
shall be subject to a civil penalty of fifty
thousand dollars per employee hired by the
political subdivision or law enforcement
agency. Any person residing in a jurisdiction
who believes that an individual has taken action
that would violate the provisions of this
section shall have standing to pursue an action.
2. Any person residing or conducting
business in a jurisdiction who believes that an
individual has taken action that would violate
the provisions of this section shall have
standing to pursue an action for injunctive
relief in the circuit court of the county in
which the action allegedly occurred or in the
circuit court of Cole County with respect to the
actions of such individual. The court shall
hold a hearing on the motion for a temporary
restraining order and preliminary injunction
within thirty days of service of the petition.
3. In such actions, the court may award
the prevailing party, other than the state of
Missouri or any political subdivision of the
state, reasonable attorney's fees and costs.
4. Sovereign immunity shall not be an
affirmative defense in any action pursuant to
this section.]
[1.480. 1. For sections 1.410 to 1.485,
the term "law-abiding citizen" shall mean a
person who is not otherwise precluded under
state law from possessing a firearm and shall

SB 858 15
not be construed to include anyone who is not
legally present in the United States or the
state of Missouri.
2. For the purposes of sections 1.410 to
1.480, "material aid and support" shall include
voluntarily giving or allowing others to make
use of lodging; communications equipment or
services, including social media accounts;
facilities; weapons; personnel; transportation;
clothing; or other physical assets. Material
aid and support shall not include giving or
allowing the use of medicine or other materials
necessary to treat physical injuries, nor shall
the term include any assistance provided to help
persons escape a serious, present risk of life-
threatening injury.
3. It shall not be considered a violation
of sections 1.410 to 1.480 to provide material
aid to federal officials who are in pursuit of a
suspect when there is a demonstrable criminal
nexus with another state or country and such
suspect is either not a citizen of this state or
is not present in this state.
4. It shall not be considered a violation
of sections 1.410 to 1.480 to provide material
aid to federal prosecution for:
(1) Felony crimes against a person when
such prosecution includes weapons violations
substantially similar to those found in chapter
570 or 571 so long as such weapons violations
are merely ancillary to such prosecution; or
(2) Class A or class B felony violations
substantially similar to those found in chapter
579 when such prosecution includes weapons
violations substantially similar to those found
in chapter 570 or 571 so long as such weapons
violations are merely ancillary to such
prosecution.
5. The provisions of sections 1.410 to
1.485 shall be applicable to offenses occurring
on or after August 28, 2021.]
[1.485. If any provision of sections 1.410
to 1.485 or the application thereof to any

SB 858 16
person or circumstance is held invalid, such
determination shall not affect the provisions or
applications of sections 1.410 to 1.485 that may
be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and the provisions of sections
1.410 to 1.485 are severable.]
✓